District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-225.03

Contract requirements.

Repealed.

History

R.S., D.C., § 80
June 20, 1874, 18 Stat. 116, ch. 337, § 2
June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 103, ch. 180, § 2
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1103(j), 32 DCR 7396

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1103.
1973 Ed., § 1-803.